Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2417XS (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 441 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.303A Dependent care expenses. 1 1. In addition to the uses permitted under sections 68A.302 2 and 68A.303, a candidate or candidateâs committee may use 3 campaign funds to pay for expenses related to the care of any 4 dependent of the candidate if all of the following conditions 5 are met: 6 a. The expense is incurred as a direct result of campaign 7 activity or as a direct result of the official duties of the 8 candidateâs office if the candidate wins election to the office 9 sought. 10 b. The candidate would not have needed the dependent care 11 but for the candidateâs candidacy for office or election to 12 that office. 13 c. The payment to the dependent care provider is reasonable 14 for the services rendered. 15 d. The dependent care provider is not the spouse or 16 dependent child of the candidate. 17 2. A candidate using campaign funds for dependent care 18 expenses shall keep a log detailing the date, campaign or 19 official purpose, length of time of care, name of dependent 20 care provider, and cost for each dependent care expense paid 21 or owed by the campaign or candidate. Total dependent care 22 expenses shall be included as a line-item expense in a report 23 submitted pursuant to section 68A.402. A candidateâs log of 24 dependent care expenses shall be provided to the board if 25 requested during the course of an audit. The candidateâs 26 committee shall preserve a dependent care log for five years 27 following the submission of a report relating to the log, or 28 for three years following the dissolution of the candidateâs 29 committee. 30 3. For purposes of this section, âdependentâ means the same 31 as defined in the Internal Revenue Code. 32